Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 2
PROGRAMS ADMINISTERED BY THE DEPARTMENT

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act enacting this part 2, see section 1 of chapter 230, Session Laws of Colorado 1993.

26-1-201. Programs administered - services provided - department of human services.

This section specifies the programs to be administered and the services to be provided by the department of human services. These programs and services include the following:

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Public assistance programs, as specified in article 2 of this title;

Protective services for adults at risk of mistreatment or self-neglect, as specified in article 3.1 of this title;

Child welfare services, as specified in article 5 of this title;

The "Colorado Family Preservation Act", as specified in article 5.5 of this title;

The "Foster Care, Residential, Day Treatment, and Agency Licensing Act", part 9 of article 6 of this title 26;

The subsidization of adoption program, as specified in article 7 of this title;

The domestic violence, sexual assault, or culturally specific programs, as specified in article 7.5 of this title;

The homeless prevention activities program, as specified in article 7.8 of this title;

Repealed.

Independent living programs, as specified in article 8.1 of this title;

The products of the rehabilitation center for the visually impaired program, as specified in article 8.2 of this title;

The blind-made products program, as specified in article 8.3 of this title;

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

The "Older Coloradans' Act", as specified in article 11 of this title;

The "Colorado Long-term Care Ombudsman Act", as specified in article 11.5 of this title;

The state homes for the aged, as specified in article 12 of this title;

The "Colorado Child Support Enforcement Act", as specified in article 13 of this title;

The "Colorado Administrative Procedure Act for the Establishment and Enforcement of Child Support", as specified in article 13.5 of this title;

Programs for the care and treatment of persons with mental health disorders, as specified in article 65 of title 27;

Programs, services, and supports for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, as specified in article 10.5 of title 27, C.R.S.;

Charges for patients, as set forth in article 92 of title 27, C.R.S.;

The Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo, as specified in article 93 of title 27;

The Colorado mental health institute at Fort Logan, as specified in article 94 of title 27; and

Foster care prevention services, as defined in section 26-5.4-102 (1) and authorized pursuant to the federal "Family First Prevention Services Act".

Source:

L. 93:

Entire part added, p. 1118, § 28, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 96:

(1)(h) amended, p. 267, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1)(m) amended, p. 1172, § 2, effective May 28.

L. 2002:

(1)(q) and (1)(r) repealed, p. 360, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(d) amended, p. 1993, § 21, effective July 1; (1)(x) amended, p. 1405, § 66, effective August 7.

L. 2010:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(x), (1)(z), (1)(aa), and (1)(bb) amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 802, § 72, effective April 29.

L. 2013:

(1)(y) amended, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1811, § 49, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2015:

(1)(l)(II) and (1)(p)(II) added by revision, (SB 15-239), ch. 160, pp. 488, 490, §§ 6, 14.

L. 2017:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), and (1)(x) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1331, § 215, effective May 25.

L. 2019:

(1)(aa) and (1)(bb) amended and (1)(cc) added, (HB 19-1308), ch. 256, p. 2460, § 8, effective August 2.

L. 2022:

(1)(j) amended, (SB 22-183), ch. 194, p. 1305, § 12, effective May 19; (1)(a), (1)(b), and (1)(c) repealed, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1518, § 83, effective July 1; (1)(h) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 856, § 91, effective July 1.